Massachusetts, session 194th, S1566.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 197A of chapter 111 of General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting, after the word “plaster”, in lines 2 and 84, the
following words “, plumbing and water piping, including water service lines,”.
SECTION 2. Said section 197A of said chapter 111, as so appearing, is hereby amended
by inserting, after the word “plaster”, in lines 35, the following words “plumbing and water
piping, including water service lines,”.
of 1